Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-2001
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that it is in the public interest to:

(1) Encourage customer-owned renewable energy resources;

(2) Stimulate the economic growth of this state;

(3) Encourage diversification of the energy resources used in this state; and

(4) Maintain low-cost, reliable electric service.

Laws 2009, LB436, § 1.